Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.225

Managing information technology as a statewide portfolio.

Management of information technology across state government requires managing resources and business processes across multiple agencies. It is no longer sufficient to pursue efficiencies within agency or individual business process boundaries. The state must manage the business process changes and information technology in support of business processes as a statewide portfolio. The director will use agency information technology portfolio planning as input to develop a statewide portfolio to guide resource allocation and prioritization decisions.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 204; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 708. Formerly RCW 43.41A.035.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.